test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-koorand_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kǭrand: # Noun 159 'eng /est talu/fin' - full paradigm
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Nom: kǭrand
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Gen: kǭrand
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Par: kǭrandt
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Dat: kǭrandõn
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Ins: kǭrandõks
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Ill: kǭrandõ
     kǭrand+N+Sg+Ela: kǭrandst
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Nom: kǭrandõd
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Gen: kǭrandõd
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Par: kǭrandidi
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Dat: kǭrandõdõn
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Ins: kǭrandõdõks
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Ill: kǭrandiž
     kǭrand+N+Pl+Ela: kǭrandist
